Oklahoma, session 2025, SB465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 37A O.S. 2021, Section 2-129, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 2-129. A. A charitable auction or charitable alcoholic
beverage event license may be issued to a charitable organization
exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), (4) 501(c)(4), (5)
501(c)(5), (6) 501(c)(6), (7) 501(c)(7), (8) 501(c)(8), (9)
501(c)(9), (10) 501(c)(10) or (19) 501(c)(19) of the United States
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The charitable alcoholic
beverage event license shall authorize the holder thereof to conduct
a wine, spirit and/or beer event which may consist of one or more of
a wine, spirit and/or beer-tasting event, a wine, spirit and/or beer
dinner event or a wine, spirit and/or beer auction, which may be
either a live auction conducted by an auctioneer or a silent auction
for which:
1. Bid sheets are accepted from interested bidders at the
event;

2. The holders of tickets are allowed to bid online for a
period not exceeding thirty (30) days prior to the event; or
3. Both bid sheets are accepted at the event and online bids
are accepted pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection.
B. A charitable alcoholic beverage event shall be conducted
solely to raise funds for charitable purposes. A charitable
alcoholic beverage license shall allow the event attendees access to
tastings, samples, dinners and alcoholic beverages as parts part of
their entrance fee or ticket price. Wine, spirits and/or beer used
in, served or consumed at a charitable alcoholic beverage event may
be purchased by the charitable organization or donated by any person
or entity.
C. The charitable alcoholic beverage event license shall be
issued for a period not exceeding four (4) days. Only eight such
licenses may be issued to an organization in any twelve-month
period; provided, institutions of higher education in this state
shall not be restricted to the maximum number of event licenses
issued in any twelve-month period pursuant to this subsection. The
charitable organization holding a charitable alcoholic beverage
event license shall not be required to obtain a special event
license.
D. Charitable auction and charitable alcoholic beverage event
license holders may also utilize a licensed caterer to provide
additional alcohol services at the event and on the premises.
E. The charitable auction license shall authorize the holder
thereof to auction wine, spirits and/or beer purchased from a retail
package store or received as a gift from an individual if the
auction is conducted to raise funds for charitable purposes. The
charitable auction license shall be issued for a period not to
exceed two (2) days. Only four such licenses shall be issued to an
organization in any twelve-month period; provided, institutions of
higher education in this state shall not be restricted to the
maximum number of auction licenses issued in any twelve-month period
pursuant to this subsection. The maximum amount of wine, spirits
and/or beer auctioned pursuant to the charitable auction license
shall not exceed fifty (50) gallons. All wines, beer and spirits
auctioned pursuant to the charitable auction license shall be
ENR. S. B. NO. 465 Page 2

registered and all fees and taxes shall be paid in accordance with
the Oklahoma Alcoholic Beverage Control Act.
F. No charitable alcoholic beverage event license shall be
required for an organization, association or nonprofit corporation
which is an economic development chamber or similar entity, provided
the event is not conducted primarily for fundraising purposes, and
provided the services of a licensed caterer are used to provide and
distribute the alcoholic beverages at the event.
ENR. S. B. NO. 465 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 10th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 465 Page 4